Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1624.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-1602, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-1602. Photo enforcement violations; law enforcement review; violation; classification; service of process; no duty to identify photo or respond; civil penalty; definitions A. Notwithstanding any other law, if a person receives a notice of violation in the mail for a violation of chapter 3, article 3 or 6 of this title or of a city or town ordinance for excessive speed or failure to obey a traffic control device that is obtained using a photo enforcement system, the person does not have to do either of the following: 1. Identify who is in the photo. 2. Respond to the notice of violation. B. The notice of violation must state the following: 1. The notice of violation is not a court issued document and the recipient is under no obligation to identify the person or respond to the notice of violation. 2. Failure to respond to the notice of violation may result in official service that may result in an additional fee being levied. C. Before a citation is issued, a law enforcement agency must review evidence that is recorded by a photo enforcement system to determine whether a violation of chapter 3, article 3 or 6 of this title or of a city or town ordinance for excessive speed or failure to obey a traffic control device occurred. D. A photo enforcement company may not determine whether a violation of chapter 3, article 3 or 6 of this title occurred for the purpose of the issuance of issuing a citation. A violation of this subsection is a class 1 misdemeanor. E. In addition to any other means authorized by the Arizona rules of civil procedure, alternative service of process must be sent by certified mail with an additional copy by regular mail and a notice must be posted on the front door of the business or residence and, if present and accessible, a residence's garage door. Service of the complaint is complete on filing the mailing receipt and proof of posting in the court having jurisdiction of the violation. Notwithstanding any other law, a person's driving privileges may not be suspended or revoked as a result of a citation that is served by alternative service of process under this subsection. F. If a law enforcement agency issues a citation as a result of a photo enforcement system and serves the citation in a manner other than what is prescribed by section 28-1593, subsection A, the agency shall inform the person that there is no obligation to identify the driver or respond to the citation. Failure to respond to the citation will result in the probability that the person will be formally served pursuant to state law and the Arizona rules of civil procedure which will likely result in the person being required to pay the cost of the service. G. If a person is found responsible for a civil traffic violation that results from a photo enforcement system, except for a red light violation pursuant to section 28-645 or a school crossing violation pursuant to section 28-797: 1. The person is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $75. $15 of the civil penalty collected shall be deposited in the peace officer training equipment fund established by section 41-1731. 2. A department or agency of this state may not consider the violation for the purpose of determining whether the person's driver license should be suspended or revoked. 3. A court may not transmit abstracts of records of the violation to the department. 4. An insurer may not consider the violation as a traffic violation against the person for the purposes of establishing rates for motor vehicle liability insurance or determining the insurability of the person. An insurer may not cancel or refuse to renew any policy of insurance because of the violation. G. H. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Notice of violation" means a notice issued by a photo enforcement company or municipality that is not a uniform traffic ticket and complaint. 2. "Photo enforcement system" has the same meaning prescribed in section 28-601. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 41-1731, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1731. Peace officer training equipment fund; exemptions A. The peace officer training equipment fund is established consisting of monies deposited pursuant to sections 12-114, and 12-116.10 and 28-1602.  The state treasurer shall administer the fund. Monies in the fund may be used only for peace officer equipment. B. The state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. C. Monies in the fund: 1. Do not revert to the state general fund at the end of the fiscal year. 2. Are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. 3. Are subject to legislative appropriation.END_STATUTE